Massachusetts, session 194th, S2473.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 33 is hereby amended by striking out section 42 as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 42. the commander in chief shall not order or authorize any part of the organized
militia or national guard personnel on state active duty to violate the Constitution of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts or any law of the Commonwealth.
of 1